Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-136
Drainage ditches; petition; survey; cost estimate.

Upon the filing of the petition provided for in section 31-135, it shall be the duty of the county board to cause a survey and estimate of the cost of such improvement to be made by some competent surveyor within sixty days thereafter.

Laws 1911, c. 141, § 2, p. 465;

R.S.1913, § 1753;

C.S.1922, § 1700;

C.S.1929, § 31-136;

R.S.1943, § 31-136.